Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1442XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1442XD (3) 91
je/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
FUNCTIONS OF DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT BOARD, AND LOCAL WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARDS
Section 1. Section 15H.9, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. The commission may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
for approving Iowa national service corps programs and national
service positions. Existing programs and service positions,
including those established through the AmeriCorps programs in
Iowa created pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §12501, Senior Corps and
AmeriCorps vista in Iowa created pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §4950 et
seq., the Iowa summer youth corps program created pursuant to
section 15H.5, the Iowa green corps program created pursuant to
section 15H.6, the Iowa reading corps program created pursuant
to section 15H.7, and the RefugeeRISE AmeriCorps program
created pursuant to section 15H.8, and the Iowa conservation
corps created pursuant to section 84A.7, are part of the Iowa
national service corps programs and national service positions.
Sec. 2. Section 84A.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The department of workforce development is created to
administer the laws of this state relating to unemployment
compensation insurance, and job placement and training,
employment safety, labor standards, and workers’ compensation.
Sec. 3. Section 84A.1A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
6. The workforce development board may establish standing
committees of the board in the bylaws of the board.
Sec. 4. Section 84A.1A, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in
lieu thereof the following:
a. All documents required by current federal workforce rules
and regulations.
Sec. 5. Section 84A.1B, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025,
LSB 1442XD (3) 91
-1- je/js 1/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
is amended to read as follows:
The In addition to the duties outlined in current federal
workforce rules and regulations, the workforce development
board shall do all of the following:
Sec. 6. Section 84A.1B, subsections 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7, 8,
9, 10, 11, 12, and 15, Code 2025, are amended by striking the
subsections.
Sec. 7. Section 84A.1B, subsection 13, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
13. Assist the governor in the designation of local
workforce development areas or regions as outlined in current
federal workforce rules and regulations.
Sec. 8. Section 84A.3, Code 2025, is amended by striking the
section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
84A.3 Local workforce development plans.
1. A local workforce development board shall, in
partnership with the chief elected official, develop a local
workforce development plan in accordance with current federal
workforce laws, rules, and regulations. The local workforce
development board shall submit the workforce development plan
to the department of workforce development for review and
approval in the manner and form determined by the department.
2. All local workforce plan modifications shall be
submitted to the department of workforce development for
review and approval in the manner and form determined by the
department. Modifications to the local workforce development
plan must be developed in accordance with current federal
workforce laws, rules, and regulations.
3. The local workforce development plan and modifications
shall include the contents required by current federal
workforce laws, rules, and regulations, and such other
information as the department of workforce development or the
state workforce development board may require.
Sec. 9. Section 84A.5, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025,
LSB 1442XD (3) 91
-2- je/js 2/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
is amended to read as follows:
a. The workforce development system shall strive to
provide high quality services to its customers including
workers, families, and businesses. The department of workforce
development shall maintain a common intake, assessment, and
customer tracking system and to the extent practical provide
one-stop services to customers at workforce development centers
and other service access points. The department of workforce
development shall administer a statewide standard skills
assessment to assess the employability skills of adult workers
statewide and shall instruct appropriate department staff in
the administration of the assessment. The assessment shall
be included in the one-stop services provided to customers at
workforce development centers and other service access points
throughout the state.
Sec. 10. Section 84A.5, subsection 5, paragraphs a, b, and
c, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs.
Sec. 11. Section 84A.5, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 12. Section 84A.5, subsection 10, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
10. The department of education, in collaboration with the
department of workforce development, is responsible for the
development and oversight of industry and sector partnerships
in the state.
Sec. 13. Section 84A.6, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 14. Section 97B.1A, subsection 8, paragraph b,
subparagraph (8), Code 2025, is amended by striking the
subparagraph.
Sec. 15. Section 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in
lieu thereof the following:
d. In collaboration with the department of workforce
development and the department of education, compile an annual
LSB 1442XD (3) 91
-3- je/js 3/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
report, in an aggregate form to protect the confidentiality
of each eligible program’s participants, that includes the
number of students receiving scholarships under this section,
the number of students receiving grants under section 256.229,
the number of scholarship and grant recipients completing
a program of study or major annually and in the prescribed
time frame under this section or section 256.229, the number
of eligible institutions participating in the scholarship
and grant programs established under this section or section
256.229, the number of written agreements entered into by the
volunteer mentor program under section 15H.10, statistics on
employment outcomes for future ready Iowa skilled workforce
last-dollar scholarship and future ready Iowa skilled workforce
grant program participants by industry, and other data as
may be deemed pertinent by the commission, the department of
workforce development, or the department of education. The
commission shall submit the report to the governor and the
general assembly annually by January 15.
Sec. 16. Section 256.229, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
d. Transmit to the department of workforce development Use
the compilation of information, data, and statistics submitted
in accordance with subsection 1, paragraph “c”, subparagraph
(6), for to compile the annual report required under section
84A.1B 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph “d”.
Sec. 17. REPEAL. Sections 84A.7, 84A.8, 84A.9, 84A.10, and
84A.11, Code 2025, are repealed.
DIVISION II
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE —— TAXABLE WAGES
Sec. 18. Section 96.1A, subsection 36, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
“Taxable wages” means an amount of wages upon which an
employer is required to contribute based upon wages which
that have been paid in this state during a calendar year to
an individual by an employer or the employer’s predecessor,
LSB 1442XD (3) 91
-4- je/js 4/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
in this state or another state which extends a like comity to
this state, with respect to employment, upon which the employer
is required to contribute, which equals the greater of the
following:
DIVISION III
IOWA STUDENT INTERNSHIP PROGRAM
Sec. 19. Section 84A.21, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
84A.21 Iowa student internship program.
1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
a. “Innovative business” means the same as defined in
section 15E.52 “Department” means the department of workforce
development.
b. “Internship” means temporary employment of a student that
focuses on providing the student with work experience in the
student’s field of study.
c. “Iowa student” means a student of an Iowa community
college, private college, or institution of higher learning
under the control of the state board of regents, or a student
who graduated from high school in Iowa but now attends an
institution of higher learning outside the state of Iowa.
2. a. The department of workforce development shall
establish and administer an internship program with two
components for Iowa students. To the extent permitted by
this section, the department of workforce development shall
administer the two components in as similar a manner as
possible.
b. The purpose of the first component of the program is
to link Iowa students to small and medium-sized Iowa firms
through internship opportunities. An Iowa employer may receive
financial assistance on a matching basis for a portion of the
wages paid to an intern. If providing financial assistance,
the department of workforce development shall provide the
assistance on a reimbursement basis such that for every two
LSB 1442XD (3) 91
-5- je/js 5/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
dollars of wages earned by the student, one dollar paid by
the employer is matched by one dollar from the department of
workforce development. The amount of financial assistance
shall not exceed three thousand one hundred dollars for any
single internship, or nine thousand three hundred dollars
for any single employer. In order to be eligible to receive
financial assistance, the employer must have five hundred
or fewer employees and must be an innovative business. The
department of workforce development shall encourage youth who
reside in economically distressed areas, youth adjudicated to
have committed a delinquent act, and youth transitioning out
of foster care to participate in the first component of the
internship program.
c. (1) The purpose of the second component of the program
is to assist in placing Iowa students studying in the fields
of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics into
internships that lead to permanent positions with Iowa
employers. The department of workforce development shall
collaborate with eligible employers, including but not limited
to innovative businesses, to ensure that the interns hired
are studying in such fields. An Iowa employer may receive
financial assistance on a matching basis for a portion of the
wages paid to an intern. If providing financial assistance,
the department of workforce development shall provide the
assistance on a reimbursement basis such that for every two
dollars of wages earned by the student, one dollar paid by
the employer is matched by one dollar from the department of
workforce development. The amount of financial assistance
shall not exceed five thousand dollars per internship.
The department of workforce development may adopt rules
to administer this component section. In adopting rules
to administer this component, the department of workforce
development shall adopt rules as similar as possible to those
adopted pursuant to paragraph “b”.
(2) The requirement to administer this component of the
LSB 1442XD (3) 91
-6- je/js 6/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
internship program is contingent upon the provision of funding
for such purposes by the general assembly.
3. a. An Iowa student internship fund is created in the
state treasury under the control of the department of workforce
development. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to
the department of workforce development and any other moneys
available to, obtained, or accepted by the department of
workforce development for placement in the fund.
b. Payments of interest, repayments of moneys loaned
pursuant to this section, and recaptures of financial
assistance shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund
are not subject to section 8.33. Notwithstanding section
12C.7, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be
credited to the fund.
c. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department
of workforce development and, with the approval of the Iowa
workforce development board, shall be used to increase the
availability of skilled workers in innovative businesses, by
providing Iowa student internship opportunities. Such moneys
shall not be used for the support of retail businesses, health
care businesses, or other businesses requiring a professional
license.
Sec. 20. APPROPRIATION —— IOWA STUDENT INTERNSHIP
FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state
to the department of workforce development for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following
amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the
purposes designated:
For deposit in the Iowa student internship fund created in
section 84A.21:
.................................................. $ 1,039,425
DIVISION IV
ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY PROGRAMS
Sec. 21. Section 84A.5, subsection 5, paragraph n, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
LSB 1442XD (3) 91
-7- je/js 7/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
n. Adult education and literacy programs with community
colleges under section 84A.19.
Sec. 22. Section 84A.19, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
84A.19 Adult education and literacy programs.
1. For purposes of this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
a. “Adult education and literacy programs”, “adult education
and literacy programs” means adult basic education, adult
education leading to a high school equivalency diploma under
chapter 259A, English as a second language instruction, and
workplace and family literacy instruction.
b. “Community colleges” means the same as defined in section
260C.2.
2. The department of workforce development and community
colleges shall jointly implement adult education and literacy
programs to assist adults and youths sixteen years of age and
older who are not in school in obtaining the knowledge and
skills necessary for further education, work, and community
involvement.
3. The department of workforce development, in consultation
with community colleges, shall prescribe standards for adult
education and literacy programs including but not limited
to contextualized and integrated instruction, assessments,
instructor qualification and professional development, data
collection and reporting, and performance benchmarks.
4. The department of workforce development, in consultation
with community colleges, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
17A to administer this section.